Illinois, session 104th, HB2044.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Procurement Code is amended by 5changing Section 45-45 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 500/45-45)7    Sec. 45-45. Small businesses. 8    (a) Set-asides. Each chief procurement officer has 9authority to designate as small business set-asides a fair 10proportion of construction, supply, and service contracts for 11award to small businesses in Illinois. Advertisements for bids 12or offers for those contracts shall specify designation as 13small business set-asides. In awarding the contracts, only 14bids or offers from qualified small businesses shall be 15considered.16    (b) Small business. "Small business" means a business that 17is independently owned and operated and that is not dominant 18in its field of operation. The chief procurement officer shall 19establish a detailed definition by rule, using in addition to 20the foregoing criteria other criteria, including the number of 21employees and the dollar volume of business. When computing 22the size status of a potential contractor, annual sales and 23receipts of the potential contractor and all of its affiliates   HB2044 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 11509 BDA 21598 b1shall be included. The maximum number of employees and the 2maximum dollar volume that a small business may have under the 3rules promulgated by the chief procurement officer may vary 4from industry to industry to the extent necessary to reflect 5differing characteristics of those industries. Notwithstanding 6the provisions of this subsection (b), no construction 7business is a small business if its annual sales and receipts 8exceed $20,000,000. , subject to the following limitations:9        (1) No wholesale business is a small business if its 10    annual sales for its most recently completed fiscal year 11    exceed $13,000,000.12        (2) No retail business or business selling services is 13    a small business if its annual sales and receipts exceed 14    $8,000,000.15        (3) No manufacturing business is a small business if 16    it employs more than 250 persons.17        (4) No construction business is a small business if 18    its annual sales and receipts exceed $14,000,000.19    (c) Fair proportion. For the purpose of subsection (a), 20for State agencies of the executive branch, a fair proportion 21of construction contracts shall be no less than 25% nor more 22than 40% of the annual total contracts for construction.23    (d) Withdrawal of designation. A small business set-aside 24designation may be withdrawn by the purchasing agency when 25deemed in the best interests of the State. Upon withdrawal, 26all bids or offers shall be rejected, and the bidders or   HB2044 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 11509 BDA 21598 b1offerors shall be notified of the reason for rejection. The 2contract shall then be awarded in accordance with this Code 3without the designation of small business set-aside. Each 4chief procurement officer shall make the annual report 5available on his or her official website. Each chief 6procurement officer shall also issue a press release in 7conjunction with the small business annual report that 8includes an executive summary of the annual report and a link 9to the annual report on the chief procurement officer's 10website.11    (e) Small business specialist. Each chief procurement 12officer shall designate one or more individuals to serve as 13its small business specialist. The small business specialists 14shall collectively work together to accomplish the following 15duties:16        (1) Compiling and maintaining a comprehensive list of 17    potential small contractors. In this duty, he or she shall 18    cooperate with the Federal Small Business Administration 19    in locating potential sources for various products and 20    services.21        (2) Assisting small businesses in complying with the 22    procedures for bidding on State contracts.23        (3) Examining requests from State agencies for the 24    purchase of property or services to help determine which 25    invitations to bid are to be designated small business 26    set-asides.  HB2044 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 11509 BDA 21598 b1        (4) Making recommendations to the chief procurement 2    officer for the simplification of specifications and terms 3    in order to increase the opportunities for small business 4    participation.5        (5) Assisting in investigations by purchasing agencies 6    to determine the responsibility of bidders or offerors on 7    small business set-asides.8    (f) Small business annual report. Each small business 9specialist designated under subsection (e) shall annually 10before November 1 report in writing to the General Assembly 11concerning the awarding of contracts to small businesses. The 12report shall include the total value of awards made in the 13preceding fiscal year under the designation of small business 14set-aside. The report shall also include the total value of 15awards made to businesses owned by minorities, women, and 16persons with disabilities, as defined in the Business 17Enterprise for Minorities, Women, and Persons with 18Disabilities Act, in the preceding fiscal year under the 19designation of small business set-aside.20    The requirement for reporting to the General Assembly 21shall be satisfied by filing copies of the report as required 22by Section 3.1 of the General Assembly Organization Act.23(Source: P.A. 103-570, eff. 1-1-24.) 24    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 25becoming law.